Iowa, session 2025-2026, HSB608.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 5 TLSB 5977HC (2) 91 mb/jh H.F. _____ Section 1. Section 279.70A, Code 2026, is amended to read 1 as follows: 2 279.70A Student identification cards ââ suicide prevention 3 information. 4 A public school that issues physical or electronic 5 identification cards to students in grades seven six 6 through twelve shall include on either side of the physical 7 identification card the crisis hotline telephone and text 8 numbers and the internet address for your life Iowa or the 9 your life Iowa successor program , and through a link on an 10 electronic identification card the internet address for your 11 life Iowa or the your life Iowa successor program . A public 12 school that issues physical or electronic identification cards 13 to students in grades grade five and six may include on either 14 side of the physical identification card the crisis hotline 15 telephone and text numbers and the internet address for your 16 life Iowa or the your life Iowa successor program , and through 17 a link on an electronic identification card the internet 18 address for your life Iowa or the your life Iowa successor 19 program . 20 Sec. 2. APPLICABILITY. This Act applies to student 21 identification cards issued on or after the effective date 22 of this Act. A school that has a supply of unused physical 23 student identification cards shall use that supply prior 24 to complying with the requirements of this Act relating to 25 physical student identification cards. 26